Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4179.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.43, is amended to read: 609.43 MISCONDUCT OF PUBLIC OFFICER OR EMPLOYEE. new text begin (a) new text end A public officer or employee who does any of the following, for which no other sentence is specifically provided by law, new text begin is guilty of a felony and new text end may be sentenced deleted text begin to imprisonment for not more than 364 days or to payment of a fine of not more than $3,000, or bothdeleted text end new text begin as provided in paragraph (b) or (c)new text end : (1) intentionally fails or refuses to perform a known mandatory, nondiscretionary, ministerial duty of the office or employment within the time or in the manner required by law; or (2) in the capacity of such officer or employee, does an act knowing it is in excess of lawful authority or knowing it is forbidden by law to be done in that capacity; or (3) under pretense or color of official authority intentionally and unlawfully injures another in the other's person, property, or rights; or (4) in the capacity of such officer or employee, makes a return, certificate, official report, or other like document having knowledge it is false in any material respect. new text begin (b) A person who violates paragraph (a) may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than one year or to payment of a fine of not more than $5,000, or both. new text end new text begin (c) A person who violates paragraph (a) a second or subsequent time may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more that five years or to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000, or both. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end